Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-407
Care, defined.

(1) Care means the exercise of concern or responsibility for the comfort, welfare, and habilitation of persons, including a minimum amount of supervision and assistance with or the provision of personal care, activities of daily living, health maintenance activities, or other supportive services.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Activities of daily living means transfer, ambulation, exercise, toileting, eating, self-administered medication, and similar activities;

(b) Health maintenance activities means noncomplex interventions which can safely be performed according to exact directions, which do not require alteration of the standard procedure, and for which the results and resident responses are predictable; and

(c) Personal care means bathing, hair care, nail care, shaving, dressing, oral care, and similar activities.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 7.